Hawaii statutes.
§484-15 Penalties. Any person who
wilfully violates this chapter or a rule adopted under it or any person who
wilfully, in an application for registration or exemption makes any untrue
statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact is guilty of a
felony and may be fined not less than $5,000 or double the amount of gain from
the transaction, whichever is the larger but not more than $250,000; or may be
imprisoned for not more than two years, or both. [L 1967, c 223, §15; HRS
§484-15; am L 1983, c 175, §11; am L 1984, c 266, §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-610(2), 640, 660.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next